Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,273
Recreation camps; inspection; local government; powers and duties.

The local government which exercises jurisdiction over a recreation camp may make inspections of such recreation camp. The local government shall have the right of entry and access to any such camp at any reasonable time.

Where, upon inspection, it is found that there is failure to protect the health and safety of the persons using the camp, or a failure to comply with the minimum health and safety requirements established by the local government which exercises jurisdiction over such recreation camp, such local government shall give notice to the camp operator of such failure, which notice shall set forth the reason or reasons for such failure.

Laws 1959, c. 328, § 3, p. 1194;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-3103;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 31.
July 18, 2026